Massachusetts, session 194th, H451.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 13 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
section:- 
Section 110. Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary, 
any applicant for an occupational license from a board of registration that is under the oversight 
of the division of occupational licensure and that requires applicants to provide their social 
security number may provide their individual taxpayer identification number or another 
document verifying their identity, as determined by the board of registration to which the 
individual is applying, in place of a social security number. 

of 2 9  SECTION 2. Chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following section:- 
Section 290. Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary, 
any applicant for an occupational license from a board of registration that is under the oversight 
of the department of public health and that requires applicants to provide their social security 
number may provide their individual taxpayer identification number or another document 
verifying their identity, as determined by the board of registration to which the individual is 
applying, in place of a social security number.